src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/noun-aaltoe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - aaltoe:

    aaltoe+N+Sg+Nom: aaltoe
    aaltoe+N+Sg+Acc: aaltoem
    aaltoe+N+Sg+Gen: aaltoen
    aaltoe+N+Sg+Ill: [aaltose, ååltese]
    aaltoe+N+Sg+Ine: aaltosne
    aaltoe+N+Sg+Ela: aaltoste
    aaltoe+N+Sg+Com: aaltojne
    aaltoe+N+Ess: aaltojne
    aaltoe+N+Pl+Nom: aaltoeh
    aaltoe+N+Pl+Acc: aaltojde
    aaltoe+N+Pl+Gen: aaltoej
    aaltoe+N+Pl+Ill: aaltojde
    aaltoe+N+Pl+Ine: aaltojne
    aaltoe+N+Pl+Ela: aaltojste
    aaltoe+N+Pl+Com: aaltoejgujmie
